Arkansas statutes. Title 11 Labor and Industrial Relations
Chapter 10 Division of Workforce Services Law
Subchapter 8
— Unemployment Compensation Fund

Preambles.

Acts 1969, No. 319, contained a preamble which read:

“Whereas, there are funds in the United States Treasury credited from time to time to the account of Arkansas that may be used for administration purposes by the Employment Security Division; and

“Whereas, the Congress of the United States, has by Public Law 90-430 increased the duration of time from ten fiscal years preceding to fifteen fiscal years preceding in which such funds so deposited in the United States Treasury may be drawn on by the State of Arkansas in order that such funds will not be lost for administrative purposes; and

“Whereas, the Congress of the United States has declared that such funds be withdrawn from the United States Treasury after an appropriation bill by the state is passed specifying the purposes and amounts;

“Now, therefore….”

Effective Dates.

Acts 1965, No. 33, § 6: June 30, 1965. Emergency clause provided: “It is hereby found and determined by the General Assembly that this Act is immediately necessary in order to obtain satisfaction of certain amounts due the Federal Government in connection with the unemployment compensation program. Therefore, an emergency is hereby declared to exist and this Act being necessary for the preservation of the public peace, health, and safety, shall take effect and be in full force from and after its passage except Section 2 hereof which shall become effective and in full force from and after June 30, 1965.”

Acts 1975, No. 609, § 19: Mar. 28, 1975. Emergency clause provided: “It is hereby found and determined by the General Assembly that various provisions of the Arkansas Employment Security Law of the State are in need of immediate clarification and revision in order to provide adequate protection to the working and unemployed citizens of this State and that this Act is immediately necessary to accomplish this purpose. An emergency is, therefore, declared to exist and this Act, being necessary for the immediate preservation of the public peace, health, and safety, shall be in full force and effect from and after the date of its passage and approval.”

Acts 1979, No. 492, § 18: Mar. 21, 1979. Emergency clause provided: “It is hereby found and determined by the General Assembly that in order to clarify certain provisions of the Employment Security Law that may be subject to misinterpretation and in order to bring the said Employment Security Law into conformity with the Federal Unemployment Tax Act as amended by P.L. 94-566, P.L. 95-19, and P.L. 95-216 so that Arkansas employers and workers may receive the benefits of the said Federal Unemployment Tax Act, an emergency is hereby declared and this Act being necessary for the immediate preservation of the public peace, health, and safety, shall take effect and be in full force and effect from and after its passage and approval.”

Acts 1979, No. 922, § 18: Apr. 16, 1979. Emergency clause provided: “It is hereby found and determined by the General Assembly that in order to clarify certain provisions of the Employment Security Law that may be subject to misinterpretation and in order to bring the said Employment Security Law into conformity with the Federal Unemployment Tax Act as amended by P.L. 94-566, P.L. 95-19, and P.L. 95-216 so that Arkansas employers and workers may receive the benefits of the said Federal Unemployment Tax Act, an emergency is hereby declared and this Act being necessary for the immediate preservation of the public peace, health, and safety shall take effect and be in full force and effect from and after its passage and approval.”

Acts 1983, No. 482, § 41: Mar. 16, 1983. Emergency clause provided: “It is hereby found and determined by the General Assembly that in order to conform with P.L. 97-300 and to bring the Arkansas Employment Security Law in conformity with the Federal Unemployment Tax Act as amended by P.L. 97-248 and to insure the future solvency of the unemployment insurance fund so that Arkansas employers may continue to receive the tax credits accorded by the Federal Unemployment Tax Act and that Arkansas workers may receive unemployment benefits when they are unemployed, an emergency is hereby declared and this Act being necessary for the immediate preservation of the public peace, health and safety shall take effect and be in full force and effect from and after its passage and approval.”

Acts 1987, No. 753, § 30: July 1, 1987. Emergency clause provided: “It is hereby found and determined by the General Assembly that in order to correct certain inequities in the payment and in the denial of benefits to unemployed workers, to make needed technical corrections to the Shared Work plan provisions which enable employers to avoid layoffs and to bring the Arkansas Employment Security Law into conformity with the Federal Unemployment Tax Act, as amended, so that Arkansas employers may continue to receive the tax credits accorded by the Federal Unemployment Tax Act and that Arkansas workers may receive unemployment benefits when they are unemployed, an emergency is hereby declared and this Act being necessary for the immediate preservation of the public peace, health and safety shall take effect and be in full force and effect on and after July 1, 1987.”

Acts 1991, No. 100, § 58: July 1, 1991. Emergency clause provided: “It is hereby found and determined by the General Assembly that the provisions of this act should become effective at the beginning of the next fiscal year; that the next fiscal year begins on July 1, 1991 and this act may not go into effect until after July 1, 1991 unless an emergency is declared. Therefore, an emergency is hereby declared to exist and this act being necessary for the preservation of the public peace, health and safety shall be in full force and effect from and after July 1, 1991.”

Acts 1993, No. 6, § 21: Feb. 1, 1993. Emergency clause provided: “It is hereby found and determined by the General Assembly that in order to correct certain inequities in the payment and in the denial of benefits to unemployed workers, to make needed technical corrections and to bring the Arkansas Employment Security Law into conformity with the Federal Unemployment Tax Act, as amended, so that Arkansas employers may continue to receive the tax credits accorded by the Federal Unemployment Tax Act and that Arkansas workers may receive unemployment benefits when they are unemployed, an emergency is hereby declared to exist and this act being necessary for the immediate preservation of the public peace, health and safety shall be in full force and effect from and after its passage and approval.”

Acts 1995, No. 519, § 14: July 1, 1995. Emergency clause provided: “It is hereby found and determined by the General Assembly that in order to correct certain inequities in the payment and in the denial of benefits to unemployed workers, to make needed technical corrections and to bring the Arkansas Employment Security Law into conformity with the Federal Unemployment Tax Act, as amended, so that Arkansas employers may continue to receive the tax credits accorded by the Federal Unemployment Tax Act and the Arkansas workers may receive unemployment benefits when they are unemployed. Therefore, an emergency is hereby declared to exist and this act being necessary for the immediate preservation of the public peace, health and safety shall be in full force and effect from and after July 1, 1995.”

Acts 1997, No. 234, § 32: Feb. 21, 1997. Emergency clause provided: “It is found and determined by the General Assembly of the State of Arkansas that in order to correct certain inequities in the payment and in the denial of benefits to unemployed workers, to make needed technical corrections and to bring the Arkansas Employment Security Law into conformity with the Federal Unemployment Tax Act, as amended, so that Arkansas employers may continue to receive the tax credits accorded by the Federal Unemployment Tax Act and the Arkansas workers may receive unemployment benefits when they are unemployed. Therefore an emergency is declared to exist and this act being immediately necessary for the preservation of the public peace, health and safety shall become effective on the date of its approval by the Governor. If the bill is neither approved nor vetoed by the Governor, it shall become effective on the expiration of the period of time during which the Governor may veto the bill. If the bill is vetoed by the Governor and the veto is overridden, it shall become effective on the date the last house overrides the veto.”

Acts 1999, No. 1116, § 19: Apr. 5, 1999. Emergency clause provided: “It is hereby found and determined by the Eighty-second General Assembly that in order to correct certain inequities in the payment and in the denial of benefits to unemployed workers, to make needed technical corrections and to bring the Arkansas Employment Security Law into conformity with the Federal Unemployment Tax Act, as amended, so that Arkansas employers may continue to receive the tax credits accorded by the Federal Unemployment Tax Act and the Arkansas workers may receive unemployment benefits when they are unemployed. Therefore, an emergency is declared to exist and this act being immediately necessary for the preservation of the public peace, health and safety shall become effective on the date of its approval by the Governor. If the bill is neither approved nor vetoed by the Governor, it shall become effective on the expiration of the period of time during which the Governor may veto the bill. If the bill is vetoed by the Governor and the veto is overridden, it shall become effective on the date the last house overrides the veto.”

Acts 2013, No. 956, § 10: Emergency clause failed to pass. Emergency clause provided: “It is found and determined by the General Assembly of the State of Arkansas that the Department of Workforce Services must ensure the prompt determination of claims for unemployment insurance benefits; that the state's unemployment insurance program must remain in conformity with federal law requirements; and that this act is immediately necessary because a delay would interfere with continued provision of benefits and services to eligible persons. Therefore, an emergency is declared to exist, and this act being necessary for the preservation of the public peace, health, and safety shall become effective on July 1, 2013.”

Acts 2019, No. 910, § 6346(b): July 1, 2019. Emergency clause provided: “It is found and determined by the General Assembly of the State of Arkansas that this act revises the duties of certain state entities; that this act establishes new departments of the state; that these revisions impact the expenses and operations of state government; and that the sections of this act other than the two uncodified sections of this act preceding the emergency clause titled ‘Funding and classification of cabinet-level department secretaries’ and ‘Transformation and Efficiencies Act transition team’ should become effective at the beginning of the fiscal year to allow for implementation of the new provisions at the beginning of the fiscal year. Therefore, an emergency is declared to exist, and Sections 1 through 6343 of this act being necessary for the preservation of the public peace, health, and safety shall become effective on July 1, 2019”.

11-10-801. Establishment and control.

There is established as a special fund, separate and apart from all public moneys or funds of this state, the “Unemployment Compensation Fund”, which shall be administered by the Director of the Division of Workforce Services exclusively for the purposes of this chapter.

The Unemployment Compensation Fund shall consist of:

All the contributions collected under this chapter;

All interest earned upon any money in the Unemployment Compensation Fund;

All property or securities acquired in lieu of contributions or other liabilities to the Unemployment Compensation Fund;

All earnings of property or securities acquired in lieu of contributions or other liabilities;

All moneys recovered on losses sustained by the Unemployment Compensation Fund;

All moneys received from the federal Unemployment Account in the federal Unemployment Trust Fund in accordance with Title XII of the Social Security Act;

All moneys credited to this state's account in the federal Unemployment Trust Fund pursuant to section 903 of the Social Security Act;

All moneys received for the Unemployment Compensation Fund from any other source;

All moneys received from the United States Government as reimbursements pursuant to section 204 of the Federal-State Extended Unemployment Compensation Act of 1970, Pub. L. No. 91-373;

All moneys received from the stabilization tax under § 11-10-706, except the proceeds of § 11-10-706(f); and

Fifteen percent (15%) of the penalty assessed on all fraudulent overpayments under § 11-10-532(a)(3), the remainder of which shall be credited to the Division of Workforce Services Special Fund.

All moneys in the Unemployment Compensation Fund shall be commingled and undivided.

History.

Acts 1941, No. 391, § 9; 1947, No. 398, § 9; 1959, No. 142, § 1; 1965, No. 33, § 1; 1973, No. 350, § 4; A.S.A. 1947, § 81-1112; Acts 1997, No. 234, § 27; 2013, No. 956, § 7; 2019, No. 375, § 1; 2019, No. 910, § 313.

Amendments.

The 2013 amendment substituted “Unemployment Compensation Fund” for “fund” throughout (b); added “acquired in lieu of contributions or other liabilities” in (b)(4); inserted “Pub. L. No. 91-373” in (b)(9); and added (b)(11).

The 2019 amendment by No. 375 rewrote (b)(11).

The 2019 amendment by No. 910 substituted “Director of the Division of Workforce Services” for “Director of the Department of Workforce Services” in (a).

U.S. Code.

Title XII of the Social Security Act referred to in this section is codified as 42 U.S.C. § 1321 et seq. Section 903 of the Social Security Act is codified as 42 U.S.C. § 1103. Section 204 of the Federal-State Extended Unemployment Act of 1970 is codified as a note under 26 U.S.C. § 3304.

11-10-802. Accounts and deposit.

The Director of the Division of Workforce Services shall be ex officio treasurer and custodian of the Unemployment Compensation Fund and disbursing officer of the Division of Workforce Services.

The director shall administer the Unemployment Compensation Fund and shall maintain within the Unemployment Compensation Fund three (3) separate accounts:

A clearing account;

An Unemployment Compensation Trust Fund Account; and

A benefit account.

All moneys payable to the Unemployment Compensation Fund, upon receipt by the director, shall be immediately deposited into the clearing account.

All moneys in the clearing account after clearance shall, except as otherwise provided in this section, be deposited immediately with the United States Secretary of the Treasury to the credit of the account of this state in the federal Unemployment Trust Fund, established and maintained pursuant to section 904 of the Social Security Act any provisions of law in this state relating to the deposit, administration, release, or disbursement of moneys in the possession or custody of this state to the contrary notwithstanding.

All moneys received in the clearing account as proceeds of § 11-10-706(f) shall be deposited and credited to the Division of Workforce Services Special Fund, § 19-5-984, pursuant to § 11-10-716.

The benefit account shall consist of all moneys requisitioned from this state's account in the federal Unemployment Trust Fund in the United States Treasury.

Except as otherwise provided in this section, moneys in the clearing and benefit accounts may be deposited into any depository bank in which general funds of the state may be deposited, but no public deposit insurance charge or premium shall be paid out of the fund.

It shall be lawful for any bank to secure such deposit with it by the pledge or escrow of the assets of the bank consisting of bonds, notes, or certificates of indebtedness which are direct obligations of the United States or of this state, and moneys in the clearing and benefit accounts shall not be commingled with other state funds but shall be maintained in separate accounts on books of the depository bank, and collateral pledged for this purpose shall be kept separate and distinct from any collateral pledged to secure other funds of the state.

The director shall furnish bond to the state with a corporate surety thereon, conditioned that he or she will faithfully perform his or her duties of employment and will properly account for all funds received and disbursed by him or her.

The bond shall be executed in the amount prescribed and in accordance with the applicable provisions of Arkansas law which prescribe surety bonds for state officers and employees and for officers and employees of state boards and commissions.

History.

Acts 1941, No. 391, § 9; 1959, No. 142, § 1; 1965, No. 33, § 1; 1979, No. 492, § 11; 1979, No. 922, § 11; A.S.A. 1947, § 81-1112; Acts 1991, No. 100, §§ 53, 54; 1997, No. 234, § 28; 2019, No. 910, § 314.

A.C.R.C. Notes.

The operation of subsection (c) of this section was suspended by adoption of a self-insured fidelity bond program for public officers, officials, and employees, effective July 20, 1987, pursuant to § 21-2-107 et seq.
Subsection (c) of this section may again become effective upon cessation of coverage under that program.
See § 21-2-703.

Amendments.

The 2019 amendment substituted “Director of the Division of Workforce Services” for “Director of the Department of Workforce Services” and “Division of Workforce Services” for “Department of Workforce Services” in (a)(1).

U.S. Code.

Section 904 of the Social Security Act referred to in this section is codified as 42 U.S.C. § 1104.

Cross References.

Bonds of state, county, and district officers, § 21-2-107.

Self-insured fidelity bond program, § 21-2-701 et seq.

11-10-803. Withdrawals.

Money requisitioned from this state's account in the federal Unemployment Trust Fund shall be used exclusively for the payment of benefits and for refunds from the Unemployment Trust Fund authorized by this chapter, except that money credited to this state's account pursuant to section 903 of the Social Security Act shall be used exclusively as provided in this section. The Director of the Division of Workforce Services shall, from time to time, requisition from the federal Unemployment Trust Fund such amounts not exceeding the amounts standing to this state's account therein as he or she deems necessary for the payment of benefits and refunds for a reasonable future period. Upon receipt thereof, the money shall be deposited into the benefit account.

For payments beginning on and after January 1, 1997, nothing in subdivision (a)(1) of this section shall be construed to prohibit deducting an amount from unemployment compensation otherwise payable to an individual and using the amount so deducted to pay for the withholding of federal individual income tax, if the individual elected to have the deduction made and the deduction was made in accordance with Pub. L. No. 103-465 and under a program approved by the United States Secretary of Labor.

Any balance of money requisitioned from the federal Unemployment Trust Fund that remains in the benefit account after the expiration of the period for which it was requisitioned shall be deducted from estimates for, and utilized in the payment of, benefits and refunds during succeeding periods or, at the discretion of the director, shall be redeposited with the United States Secretary of the Treasury to the credit of the state's account in the federal Unemployment Trust Fund.

Expenditures of money in the benefit account and refunds from the clearing account shall not be subject to any provisions of law requiring specific appropriations or other formal release by state officers of money in their custody.

All warrants issued for the payment of benefits and refunds shall bear the signature of the director or his or her duly authorized agent for that purpose.

Money credited to the account of this state in the federal Unemployment Trust Fund by the United States Secretary of the Treasury pursuant to section 903 of the Social Security Act may not be requisitioned from this state's account or used except for the payment of benefits and for the payment of expenses incurred for the administration of this chapter. However, the money may not be used for Job Training Partnership Act [repealed] programs and activities. The money may be requisitioned pursuant to the provisions of this chapter for the payment of benefits. The money may also be requisitioned and used for the payment of expenses incurred in the administration of this chapter. The money may be used only pursuant to a specific appropriation by the General Assembly and only if the expenses are incurred and the money is requisitioned after the enactment of an appropriation law that:

Specifies the purposes for which money is appropriated and the amounts appropriated therefor;

Limits the period within which the money may be obligated to a period ending not more than two (2) years after the date of the enactment of the appropriation law;

Limits the amount which may be obligated to an amount that does not exceed the amount by which the aggregate of the amounts transferred to the account of this state pursuant to section 903 of the Social Security Act exceeds the aggregate of the amounts used by this state pursuant to this chapter and charged against the amounts transferred to the account of this state; and

Notwithstanding subdivisions (d)(1)(A)-(C) of this section, moneys credited with respect to federal fiscal years 1999, 2000, and 2001 shall be used solely for the administration of the unemployment compensation program or in a manner allowable by the enabling legislation.

Any amount credited to the state's account under section 903 of the Social Security Act that has been appropriated for expenses of administration, whether or not withdrawn from the trust fund, shall be excluded from the Unemployment Compensation Fund balance for the purpose of determining solvency of the fund and for experience rating purposes.

Money appropriated as provided in this section for the payment of expenses of administration shall be requisitioned as needed for the payment of obligations incurred under the appropriation and, upon requisition, shall be deposited into the Employment Security Administration Fund, § 11-10-320, from which the payments shall be made.

Money so deposited shall, until expended, remain a part of the Unemployment Compensation Fund and, if it will not be expended, shall be returned promptly to the account of this state in the federal Unemployment Trust Fund.

History.

Acts 1941, No. 391, § 9; 1947, No. 398, § 9; 1959, No. 142, § 1; 1965, No. 33, § 1; 1969, No. 319, § 1; 1973, No. 350, § 4; 1975, No. 609, § 8; 1983, No. 482, § 31; A.S.A. 1947, § 81-1112; Acts 1987, No. 753, § 18; 1993, No. 6, § 17; 1995, No. 519, § 10; 1995, No. 1296, § 42; 1999, No. 1116, § 15; 2019, No. 910, § 315.

Amendments.

The 2019 amendment substituted “Director of the Division of Workforce Services” for “Director of the Department of Workforce Services” in the second sentence of (a)(1).

U.S. Code.

Section 903 of the Social Security Act referred to in this section is codified as 42 U.S.C. § 1103.

The Job Training Partnership Act, referred to in this section, is codified as 18 U.S.C. § 665, 29 U.S.C. §§ 49, 801-999 [repealed], 1501 et seq. [repealed], 1601 et seq. [repealed], 1701 et seq., and 42 U.S. §§ 602 , 632 [repealed], 633 [repealed].

Public Law 103-465, as it relates to social security, is codified as 42 U.S.C. § 503; Public Law 103-465, as it relates to employees' compensation, is codified as 29 U.S.C. §§ 1021, 1053-1056, 1082, 1103, 1108, 1132, 1301, 1303, 1305, 1306, 1310, 1311 [repealed], 1322, 1343, 1346, and 1350.

11-10-804. Federal Unemployment Trust Fund — Termination.

The provisions of this subchapter, to the extent that they relate to the federal Unemployment Trust Fund, shall be operative only so long as the federal Unemployment Trust Fund continues to exist and so long as the United States Secretary of the Treasury continues to maintain for this state a separate book account of all funds deposited therein by this state for benefit purposes, together with this state's proportionate share of the earnings of the federal Unemployment Trust Fund, from which no other state is permitted to make withdrawals.

If and when the federal Unemployment Trust Fund ceases to exist, or such separate book account is no longer maintained, all moneys, properties, and securities belonging to the Unemployment Compensation Fund of this state shall be administered by the Director of the Division of Workforce Services as a trust fund for the purpose of paying benefits under this chapter.

The director shall have authority to hold, invest, transfer, sell, deposit, and release the moneys and any properties, securities, or earnings acquired as an incident to the administration.

The moneys shall be invested in readily marketable classes of securities, bonds, or other interest-bearing obligations of the United States or secured as to both interest and principal by the United States.

The investments shall at all times be so made that all the assets of the fund shall always be readily convertible into cash when needed for the payment of benefits.

History.

Acts 1941, No. 391, § 9; 1965, No. 33, § 1; A.S.A. 1947, § 81-1112; Acts 2019, No. 910, § 316.

Amendments.

The 2019 amendment substituted “Director of the Division of Workforce Services” for “Director of the Department of Workforce Services” in (b)(1).

Subchapter 9
— Division of State New Hire Registry

A.C.R.C. Notes.

References to “this chapter” in subchapters 1-8 may not apply to this subchapter which was enacted subsequently.

Effective Dates.

Acts 1997, No. 1276, § 6: Apr. 9, 1997. Emergency clause provided: “It is found and determined by the General Assembly of the State of Arkansas that this act creates the Division of State New Hire Registry within the Arkansas Employment Security Department; that the Division is to compile a state registry of newly-hired and returning employees as required by the Personal Responsibility and Work Opportunity Reconciliation Act of 1996 (P.L. 104-193); and that to provide for the effective administration of this act, it should become effectively immediately. Therefore, an emergency is declared to exist and this act being immediately necessary for the preservation of the public peace, health and safety shall become effective on the date of its approval by the Governor. If the bill is neither approved nor vetoed by the Governor, it shall become effective on the expiration of the period of time during which the Governor may veto the bill. If the bill is vetoed by the Governor and the veto is overridden, it shall become effective on the date the last house overrides the veto.”

Acts 2009, No. 802, § 14: Apr. 3, 2009. Emergency clause provided: “It is found and determined by the General Assembly of the State of Arkansas that this act should go into effect as soon as possible in order to assure the prompt determination of claims for unemployment benefits and the continued provision of benefits and services to eligible persons. Therefore, an emergency is declared to exist and this act being immediately necessary for the preservation of the public peace, health, and safety shall become effective on: (1) The date of its approval by the Governor; (2) If the bill is neither approved nor vetoed by the Governor, the expiration of the period of time during which the Governor may veto the bill; or (3) If the bill is vetoed by the Governor and the veto is overridden, the date the last house overrides the veto.”

Acts 2013, No. 956, § 10: Emergency clause failed to pass. Emergency clause provided: “It is found and determined by the General Assembly of the State of Arkansas that the Department of Workforce Services must ensure the prompt determination of claims for unemployment insurance benefits; that the state's unemployment insurance program must remain in conformity with federal law requirements; and that this act is immediately necessary because a delay would interfere with continued provision of benefits and services to eligible persons. Therefore, an emergency is declared to exist, and this act being necessary for the preservation of the public peace, health, and safety shall become effective on July 1, 2013.”

Acts 2019, No. 910, § 6346(b): July 1, 2019. Emergency clause provided: “It is found and determined by the General Assembly of the State of Arkansas that this act revises the duties of certain state entities; that this act establishes new departments of the state; that these revisions impact the expenses and operations of state government; and that the sections of this act other than the two uncodified sections of this act preceding the emergency clause titled ‘Funding and classification of cabinet-level department secretaries’ and ‘Transformation and Efficiencies Act transition team’ should become effective at the beginning of the fiscal year to allow for implementation of the new provisions at the beginning of the fiscal year. Therefore, an emergency is declared to exist, and Sections 1 through 6343 of this act being necessary for the preservation of the public peace, health, and safety shall become effective on July 1, 2019”.

11-10-901. Creation — Administrator — Authority.

The Director of the Division of Workforce Services is assigned responsibility for the administration of the State New Hire Registry.

The director shall hire an administrator of the State New Hire Registry who shall serve at the pleasure of the director.

The administrator shall compile a state registry of newly hired and returning employees as required by the Personal Responsibility and Work Opportunity Reconciliation Act of 1996, Pub. L. No. 104-193.

The director may enter into such professional services contracts as may be necessary to assist in the development and operation of the State New Hire Registry.

The director shall enter into agreements with other state and federal agencies as may be necessary to properly administer and carry out the requirements of the Personal Responsibility and Work Opportunity Reconciliation Act of 1996, Pub. L. No. 104-193, to ensure confidentiality of data and reimbursement for any costs associated with meeting the requirements of this subchapter and the Personal Responsibility and Work Opportunity Reconciliation Act of 1996, Pub. L. No. 104-193.

History.

Acts 1997, No. 1276, § 1; 2009, No. 802, § 12; 2019, No. 910, § 317.

Amendments.

The 2019 amendment substituted “Director of the Division of Workforce Services” for “Director of the Department of Workforce Services” in (a)(1).

U.S. Code.

The Personal Responsibility and Work Opportunity Reconciliation Act of 1996, Pub. L. 104-193, referred to in this section is codified primarily as 8 U.S.C. § 1611 et seq. and 42 U.S.C. § 601 et seq.

11-10-902. Reporting requirements — Enforcement of child support obligations — Confidentiality — Definitions.

As used in this section:

“Administrator” means the administrator of the State New Hire Registry;

“Employee” means an individual who is an employee as defined in Chapter 24 of the Internal Revenue Code of 1986 but does not include an employee of a federal or state agency performing intelligence or counterintelligence operations if the head of the agency has determined that reporting pursuant to subsection (b) of this section could endanger the safety of the employee or could compromise an ongoing operation or investigation;

“Employer” means an employer as that term is defined in section 3401(d) of the Internal Revenue Code of 1986 and includes any labor organization and any governmental entity; and

“Labor organization” means a labor organization as that term is defined in section 2(5) of the National Labor Relations Act and includes any entity, sometimes known as a “hiring hall”, that is used by the labor organization and an employer to carry out the requirements listed in section 8(f)(3) of the federal act of an agreement between the organization and the employer.

The administrator shall compile an automated state registry of newly hired and returning employees.

An employer shall report electronically or in any manner authorized by the Division of Workforce Services for inclusion in the State New Hire Registry whenever an employee:

Is newly hired; or

If the individual was previously employed by the employer but has been separated from the previous employment for at least sixty (60) consecutive days, returns to work.

An employer shall include in each report:

The name, address, and Social Security number of the employee and the date the employee began performing services for the employer; and

The name, address, and federal taxpayer identification number of the employer.

An employer shall make the report by submitting a copy of Internal Revenue Service Form W-4 for the employee or an equivalent form.

An employer may transmit the report by first class mail, magnetically, or electronically.

If an employer makes the report by mail, the reporting date is that of the postmark.

The report shall be received not later than twenty (20) days after the date the employer hires the employee or, in the case of an employer transmitting reports magnetically or electronically, by two (2) monthly transmissions, if necessary, not less than twelve (12) days nor more than sixteen (16) days apart.

An employer that has employees employed in two (2) or more states and transmits reports magnetically or electronically may comply with the reporting requirements of this section by designating one (1) state in which the employer has employees and to which the employer will transmit the report required by this section.

An employer that transmits reports shall notify the United States Secretary of Health and Human Services in writing as to which state the employer designates for the purpose of sending reports.

Information reported pursuant to this section shall be entered into the State New Hire Registry database maintained by the Division of Workforce Services or its designated contractor within five (5) business days of receipt from an employer. As used herein, “business day” means a day on which state offices are open for regular business.

Within two (2) business days after the date information regarding a newly hired employee is entered into the State New Hire Registry, the Office of Child Support Enforcement shall transmit a notice to the employer directing the employer to withhold from the income of the employee an amount equal to the monthly or other periodic child support obligation, including any past due child support obligation, of the employee.

Within three (3) business days after the date information regarding a newly hired employee is entered into the State New Hire Registry, the Division of Workforce Services or its designated contractor shall furnish the information to the National Directory of New Hires.

On a quarterly basis, the State New Hire Registry shall furnish to the National Directory of New Hires extracts of reporting required to be made to the United States Secretary of Labor concerning the wages and unemployment compensation paid to individuals by such dates, in such format, and containing such information as the United States Secretary of Health and Human Services shall specify in regulations.

The Department of Human Services shall have access to information reported by employers pursuant to this section for the purpose of verifying eligibility for programs pursuant to 42 U.S.C. § 1320b-7.

The Division of Workforce Services shall have access to information reported by employers pursuant to this section for purposes of administering the Division of Workforce Services' programs.

The Workers' Compensation Commission shall have access to information reported by employers pursuant to this section for purposes of administering the workers' compensation programs.

The Division of Workforce Services shall directly or by contract conduct automated comparisons of the Social Security numbers reported by employers and the Social Security numbers appearing within records of the Office of Child Support Enforcement for cases being enforced under the Title IV-D State Plan.

When an information comparison reveals a match with respect to the Social Security number of an individual required to provide child support under a support order, the State New Hire Registry shall immediately provide the Office of Child Support Enforcement with the name, address, and Social Security number of the employee to whom the Social Security number is assigned and the name, address, and federal employer identification number of the employer.

The Office of Child Support Enforcement shall use information received pursuant to subsection (d) of this section to locate individuals for purposes of establishing paternity and establishing, modifying, and enforcing child support obligations and may disclose that information to its agents under contract for purposes connected to the administration of the Title IV-D Child Support Program.

All information gathered and maintained by the State New Hire Registry:

Shall be held confidential and be utilized solely for the purposes authorized in this section; and

Is an exception to the open public record requirements of the Freedom of Information Act of 1967, § 25-19-101 et seq.

To the maximum extent allowable, all expenses associated with the development and operation of the State New Hire Registry shall be reimbursed through available funding under the Title IV-D Child Support Program.

History.

Acts 1997, No. 1276, § 2; 2009, No. 802, § 13; 2013, No. 956, § 8; 2019, No. 910, §§ 318-322.

Amendments.

The 2013 amendment rewrote (b)(2) and (b)(3); and subdivided (b)(4) and (b)(5).

The 2019 amendment substituted “Division of Workforce Services” for “Department of Workforce Services” throughout the section.

U.S. Code.

Chapter 24 of the Internal Revenue Code of 1986, referred to in this section, is codified as 26 U.S.C. § 3401 et seq., and § 3401(d) of the Internal Revenue Code is codified as 26 U.S.C. § 3401(d). Section 2 of the National Labor Relations Act is codified as 29 U.S.C. § 152. The reference to Title IV-D is a reference to Title IV-D of the Social Security Act, which is codified as 42 U.S.C. § 651 et seq.